Hawaii, session 2026, SB2615.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 302A-405, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended as follows: 1.  By amending subsection (a) to read: "(a)  The price for school meals shall be set by the department to ensure that moneys received from the sale of the meals shall be not less than [one-half] one-quarter of the cost of preparing the meals.  The prices for school meals may be adjusted annually based on the previous year's costs rounded to the nearest five cents; provided that the department by rule shall provide a lower rate or free meals to children based on their economic need." 2.  By amending subsection (c) to read: "(c)  It is the intent of this section not to jeopardize the receipt of any federal aid and to the extent, and only to the extent necessary to effectuate this intent, the governor may modify the strict provisions of this section, but shall promptly report [any such] the modification with the governor's reasons therefor to the next succeeding session of the legislature for review." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________